Utah statutes.
63B-1b-301.   State treasurer may sell, assign, or liquidate agency bonds --
Marketing plan required.
(1)  One or more authorizing agencies may from time to time request the state
treasurer to sell, assign, or liquidate agency bonds on behalf of the
authorizing agencies as provided in Section 63B-1b-302.
(2) (a)  Agency bonds shall be sold, assigned, transferred, or liquidated by
the state treasurer pursuant to a marketing plan provided by the state
treasurer under Section 63B-1b-302.
(b)  The governor or the governor's designee and the appropriate authorizing
agency shall approve the marketing plan, in writing.
